District of Columbia statutes.
9-1117.01

Mayor authorized to enter into Compact; purpose.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to enter into and execute on behalf of the District a compact with any state or states legally joining the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact (“Compact”).

(b)

The parties to this Compact are the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Virginia, and the State of Maryland (“Parties”).

(c)

The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate the prompt and orderly removal of disabled and abandoned vehicles from the bridges by giving all 3 Parties jurisdiction to exercise appropriate authority anywhere on the following bridges which pass through the territory of 2 or more of the jurisdictions: the Woodrow Wilson Memorial Bridge, Rochambeau Memorial Bridge, George Mason Memorial Bridge, Theodore Roosevelt Memorial Bridge, Francis Scott Key Bridge, Chain Bridge, and American Legion Memorial Bridge.

History

March 31, 2000, D.C. Law 13-63, § 2, 46 DCR 9217

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) authority of Mayor to execute Compact, see § 2 of Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Temporary Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-4, May 28, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 5304).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) authorization of the District to remove disabled vehicles from any portion of the Potomac River Bridges, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-16, February 10, 1999, 46 DCR 2349).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of continued participation in towing compact, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-88, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5319).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of continued participation in towing compact, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Potomac River Bridges Towing Compact Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-222, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 470).